Vermont, session 2025-2026, H564.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. chapter 182, subchapter 2 is amended to read:
Subchapter 2. Compensation for Wrongful Convictions
§ 5572. RIGHT OF ACTION; PROCEDURE
(a) A person convicted and imprisoned for a crime of which the person was
exonerated pursuant to this chapter shall have a cause of action for damages
against the State.
VT LEG #386233 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.564
2026 Page 2 of 7
(b) A person is exonerated under subsection (a) of this section if the person
establishes the following by clear and convincing evidence:
(1) The person was convicted of a felony crime, was sentenced to a term
of imprisonment, and served at least six months of the sentence in a
correctional facility.
(2)(A) the person’s conviction was reversed or vacated, the
complainant’s information or indictment was dismissed, or the complainant
was acquitted after a second or subsequent trial; or
(B) the person was pardoned for the crime for which the person was
sentenced.
(3) The person is actually innocent of the felony or felonies that are the
basis for the claim. As used in this chapter, a person is “actually innocent” of a
felony or felonies if the person did not engage in any illegal conduct alleged in
the charging documents for which the person was charged, convicted, and
imprisoned, and that served as the basis for the conviction.
(4) The person did not fabricate evidence or commit or suborn perjury
during any proceedings related to the crime with which the person was
charged.
(c) An action brought under this subchapter shall be filed in Washington
County Superior Court. Notice of the action shall be served upon the Attorney
General.
VT LEG #386233 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.564
2026 Page 3 of 7
(c)(d) The Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure shall apply to actions brought
under this subchapter, and the plaintiff shall have a right to trial by jury. The
Vermont Rules of Appellate Procedure shall apply to appeals from orders and
judgments issued under this subchapter.
(d)(e) The Attorney General may consider, adjust, determine, and settle any
claim for damages brought against the State of Vermont under this subchapter.
* * *
§ 5574. BURDEN OF PROOF; FINDINGS; JUDGMENT; DAMAGES
(a) A claimant shall be entitled to judgment in an action under this
subchapter if the claimant establishes and the court finds each of the following
by clear and convincing evidence:
(1) The complainant was convicted of a felony crime, was sentenced to
a term of imprisonment, and served at least six months of the sentence in a
correctional facility.
(2)(A) the complainant’s conviction was reversed or vacated, the
complainant’s information or indictment was dismissed, or the complainant
was acquitted after a second or subsequent trial; or
(B) the complainant was pardoned for the crime for which he or she
the complainant was sentenced.
(3) The complainant is actually innocent of the felony or felonies that
are the basis for the claim. As used in this chapter, a person is “actually
VT LEG #386233 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.564
2026 Page 4 of 7
innocent” of a felony or felonies if he or she the person did not engage in any
illegal conduct alleged in the charging documents for which he or she the
person was charged, convicted, and imprisoned, and that served as the basis for
the conviction.
(4) The complainant did not fabricate evidence or commit or suborn
perjury during any proceedings related to the crime with which he or she the
complainant was charged.
(b) A claimant awarded judgment in an action under this subchapter shall
be entitled to damages in an amount to be determined by the trier of fact for
each year the claimant was incarcerated, provided that the amount of damages
shall not be less than $30,000.00 nor greater than $60,000.00 for each year the
claimant was incarcerated, adjusted proportionally for partial years served.
The damage award may also include:
(1) economic damages, including lost wages and costs incurred by the
claimant for his or her the claimant’s criminal defense and for efforts to prove
his or her the claimant’s innocence;
(2) up to 10 years of eligibility for State-funded health coverage
equivalent to Medicaid services;
(3) compensation for any reasonable reintegrative services and mental
and physical health care costs incurred by the claimant for the time period
VT LEG #386233 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.564
2026 Page 5 of 7
between his or her the claimant’s release from mistaken incarceration and the
date of the award; and
(4) reasonable attorney’s fees and costs for the action brought under this
subchapter.
(c) Damages awarded under this section:
(1) shall not be subject to any State taxes, except for the portion of the
judgment awarded as attorney’s fees; and
(2) shall not be offset by any services awarded to the claimant pursuant
to this section or by any expenses incurred by the State or any political
subdivision of the State, including expenses incurred to secure or maintain the
claimant’s custody or to feed, clothe, or provide medical services for the
claimant.
(d) The claimant’s acceptance of a damages award, compromise, or
settlement as a result of a claim under this subchapter shall be in writing and,
except when procured by fraud, shall be final and conclusive on the claimant,
and constitute a complete release by the claimant of any claim against the State
and a complete bar to any action by the claimant against the State with respect
to the same subject matter.
(e) A claimant shall be entitled to compensation under this subchapter only
for the years in which he or she the claimant would not otherwise have been
incarcerated for another sentence.
VT LEG #386233 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.564
2026 Page 6 of 7
* * *
§ 5576. LIMITATIONS
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, an action for
compensation under this subchapter shall be commenced within three years
after the person is exonerated pursuant to subchapter 1 of this chapter as
defined in subdivisions 5572(b)(1)–(4) of this title through the person’s
conviction being reversed or vacated, the information or indictment being
dismissed, the person being acquitted after a second or subsequent trial, or
through the granting of a pardon.
(b)(1) If the State challenges the exoneration of a person entitled to bring
an action under this subchapter, the limitations period shall not commence
until the challenge is finally resolved.
(2) If a person entitled to bring an action under this subchapter is not
provided the notice required by section 5577 of this title, the person shall have
an additional year within which to bring the action.
§ 5577. NOTICE OF RIGHT OF ACTION
(a) A copy of this subchapter shall be provided to a person by a court:
(1) exonerating a person pursuant to subchapter 1 of this chapter as
defined in subdivisions 5572(b)(1)–(4) of this title through vacating or
reversing the person’s conviction, dismissing the information or indictment, or
entering judgment on an acquittal after a second or subsequent trial; or
VT LEG #386233 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.564
2026 Page 7 of 7
(2) receiving notice of a pardon.
(b) A person receiving a copy of this subchapter pursuant to subsection (a)
of this section shall be required to acknowledge its receipt in writing on a form
established by the Court Administrator. The acknowledgement shall be
entered on the docket by the court and shall be admissible in an action filed
under this subchapter.
§ 5578. APPLICABILITY; RETROACTIVITY
Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214(b), this subchapter and any amendments
thereto shall apply to any exoneration that occurs on or after July 1, 2007.
§ 5579. ACTION SURVIVES
An action for compensation under this subchapter shall survive the death of
the person who has the right to bring the action under section 5572 of this title,
and the action may be commenced and prosecuted by the executor or
administrator of the person’s estate.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386233 v.1